Idaho, session 2025, H0034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2332A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2332A. INTERAGENCY CONTRACTS WITH STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-2332, Idaho
Code, no agency may enter into a noncompetitive contract with a state insti-
tution of higher education, unless authorized pursuant to section 67-9221,
Idaho Code. Contracts between such entities must be competitively solicited
pursuant to the provisions of the state procurement act, chapter 92, title
67, Idaho Code. However, the solicitation may limit competition to only the
state institutions of higher education. When seeking a contract with a state
institution of higher education, an agency shall determine each state insti-
tution of higher education's interest in competing for the contract. If more
than one (1) state institution of higher education indicates an interest in
competing, the agency shall seek quotes or proposals and award the contract
to the state institution of higher education it determines provided the best
offer based on cost and other relevant criteria.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to
procurements of surplus property governed by other state or federal law.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Agency" has the same meaning as provided in section 67-9203(3),
Idaho Code.
(b) "State institution of higher education" means Boise state univer-
sity, Idaho state university, Lewis-Clark state college, or the univer-
sity of Idaho.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.